New York, session 2025-2026, A10087.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "take the wheel act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 23 of section 375 of the vehicle and traffic law is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 23. Every motor vehicle operated for hire upon the public highways of 6 this state: (a) shall be equipped with handles or other devices which 7 shall permit the door or doors to the passenger compartment to be readi- 8 ly opened from the interior of the vehicle; and (b) shall not be a vehi- 9 cle operated by an automated driving system without a human driver phys- 10 ically present in such vehicle, seated behind the steering wheel and 11 engaged in the task of driving. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13698-03-6